Washington statutes.
RCW 11.102.050

Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the uniform common trust fund act.

[ 1985 c 30 s 83. Prior: 1955 c 33 s 30.28.050; prior: 1943 c 55 s 4; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 3388-3. Formerly RCW 30.28.050.]

NOTES:

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.